lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_semiFinalE.txt
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}an      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}an      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egken     VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itn     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itn     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itn       VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egken   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itn     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itn       VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][4SgPoss]:^min             VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4SgPoss]:^min             VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmin     VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggn           VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggn           VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeggn   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megn            VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megn            VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegn    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megten          VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megten          VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegten  VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
